New York, session 2025-2026, S3675.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1263 of the public authorities law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 10 to read as follows: 3 10. Where a substantial number of persons are unable to attend a 4 public hearing as the result of insufficient seating capacity, one 5 subsequent, additional hearing shall be required in order to comply with 6 public hearing requirements. Such subsequent hearing shall be held in 7 reasonable proximity to the location of the hearing which did not 8 provide adequate public accommodations. An officer or employee of the 9 authority shall record the names and addresses of any interested persons 10 who are unable to enter a hearing room due to capacity limitations and 11 shall notify such persons by mail of the date and location of the subse- 12 quent hearing, in addition to any other hearing notice requirements. 13 Where the authority determines that extensive public interest is antic- 14 ipated regarding the issue being addressed, a required hearing shall be 15 held in a venue designed to accommodate such public participation. The 16 authority shall presume that there is a substantial public interest in 17 fare increases or service reductions. For the purposes of this subdivi- 18 sion, "substantial number" shall be interpreted to mean more than seven- 19 ty-five persons. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05219-01-5